Utah statutes.
13-22-17.   Written agreement required.
(1)  A professional fund raiser may only engage in activities on behalf of a
charitable organization through written agreement with the organization.
(2)  A professional fund raising counsel or consultant may only engage in
activities on behalf of a charitable organization through written agreement
with the organization.
(3)  A charitable organization may only engage the services of a professional
fund raiser or professional fund raising counsel or consultant through written
agreement.
(4)  Copies of the agreement required by this section shall be attached to all
applications for registration and or a permit.
